Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.020

Appearance before judicial officer—Issuance of order.

Upon the appearance before a judicial officer of a person charged with an offense, the judicial officer must issue an order that, pending trial, the person be:

(1) Released on personal recognizance;

(2) Released on a condition or combination of conditions ordered under RCW 10.21.030 or other provision of law;

(3) Temporarily detained as allowed by law; or

(4) Detained as provided under chapter 254, Laws of 2010.

[ 2010 c 254 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Contingent effective date—2010 c 254: See notes following RCW 10.21.010.